cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX O Y 18
SFX O я йи я
SFX O я йин я
SFX O я йине я
SFX O я йинче я
SFX O я йипе я
SFX O я йисӗр я
SFX O я йисем/P я
SFX O я йишӗн я
SFX O я йӑсем/P я
SFX O я йӑн я
SFX O я йӑна я
SFX O я йӑра я
SFX O я йӑран я
SFX O я йӑпа я
SFX O я йӑпалан я
SFX O я йӑсӑр я
SFX O я йӑшӑн я
SFX O я йӑри я

SFX V Y 136
SFX V 0 етӗп .
SFX V р местӗп .
SFX V 0 етӗн .
SFX V р местӗн .
SFX V 0 ет .
SFX V р мест .
SFX V 0 етпӗр .
SFX V р местпӗр .
SFX V 0 етӗр .
SFX V р местӗр .
SFX V 0 еҫҫӗ .
SFX V р меҫҫӗ .
SFX V 0 еетӗп .
SFX V 0 ейместӗп .
SFX V 0 еетӗн .
SFX V 0 ейместӗн .
SFX V 0 еет .
SFX V 0 еймест .
SFX V 0 еетпӗр .
SFX V 0 ейместпӗр .
SFX V 0 еетӗр .
SFX V 0 ейместӗр .
SFX V 0 ееҫҫӗ .
SFX V 0 еймеҫҫӗ .
SFX V 0 ӗп .
SFX V р мӗп .
SFX V 0 ӗн .
SFX V р мӗн .
SFX V 0 ӗ .
SFX V р мӗ . 
SFX V 0 ӗпӗр .
SFX V р мӗпӗр .
SFX V 0 ӗр .
SFX V р мӗр .
SFX V 0 ӗҫ .
SFX V р мӗҫ .
SFX V р тӗм .
SFX V р мерӗм .
SFX V р тӗн .
SFX V р мерӗн .
SFX V р чӗ .
SFX V р мерӗ .
SFX V р тӗмӗр .
SFX V р мерӗмӗр .
SFX V р тӗр .
SFX V р мерӗр .
SFX V р чӗҫ .
SFX V р мерӗҫ .
SFX V 0 еттӗм .
SFX V 0 еттӗмччӗ .
SFX V р местӗмччӗ .
SFX V р местӗм .
SFX V 0 еттӗн .
SFX V 0 еттӗнччӗ .
SFX V р местӗнччӗ .
SFX V р местӗн .
SFX V 0 етчӗ .
SFX V р местчӗ .
SFX V 0 еттӗмӗр .
SFX V р еттӗмӗрччӗ .
SFX V р местӗмӗрччӗ .
SFX V р местӗмӗр .
SFX V 0 еттӗр .
SFX V 0 еттӗрччӗ .
SFX V р местӗрччӗ .
SFX V р местӗр .
SFX V 0 етчӗҫ .
SFX V р местчӗҫ .
SFX V 0 сеттӗм .
SFX V 0 сеттӗмччӗ .
SFX V 0 сеттӗн .
SFX V 0 сеттӗнччӗ .
SFX V 0 сеччӗ .
SFX V 0 сеттӗмӗр .
SFX V 0 сеттӗмӗрччӗ .
SFX V 0 сеттӗр .
SFX V 0 сеттӗрччӗ .
SFX V 0 сеччӗҫ .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗм .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗмччӗ .
SFX V р меттӗм .
SFX V р меттӗмччӗ .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗн .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗнччӗ .
SFX V р мӗттӗн .
SFX V р мӗттӗнччӗ .
SFX V 0 ӗччӗ .
SFX V р мӗччӗ .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗмӗр .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗмӗрччӗ .
SFX V р мӗттӗмӗр .
SFX V р мӗттӗмӗрччӗ .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗр .
SFX V 0 ӗттӗрччӗ .
SFX V р мӗттӗр .
SFX V р мӗттӗрччӗ .
SFX V 0 ӗччӗҫ .
SFX V р мӗччӗҫ .
SFX V 0 ӗпин .
SFX V р мӗпин .
SFX V 0 ӗсӗн .
SFX V р мӗсӗн .
SFX V 0 ин .
SFX V р мин .
SFX V 0 ӗпӗрин .
SFX V р мӗпӗрин .
SFX V 0 ӗсӗр .
SFX V р мӗсӗр .
SFX V 0 ӗҫин .
SFX V р мӗҫин .
SFX V 0 ем .
SFX V р тӗр .
SFX V 0 ер .
SFX V 0 ӗр .
SFX V р ччӗр .
SFX V р ме .
SFX V р месӗр .
SFX V р мешкӗн .
SFX V 0 екен/B .
SFX V р ни/B .
SFX V р менни/B .
SFX V 0 ес .
SFX V 0 есшӗн .
SFX V р нӗ .
SFX V р мелле .
SFX V 0 ен .
SFX V 0 се .
SFX V 0 сен .
SFX V 0 сессӗн .
SFX V р месен .
SFX V р месессӗн .
SFX V 0 е .
SFX V 0 иччен .
SFX V р миччен .
SFX V р мессерен .
SFX V р нӗҫемӗн .

SFX W Y 136
SFX W 0 атӑп .
SFX W р мастӑп .
SFX W 0 атӑн .
SFX W р мастӑн .
SFX W 0 ать .
SFX W р масть .
SFX W 0 атпӑр .
SFX W р мастпӑр .
SFX W 0 атӑр р
SFX W р мастӑр .
SFX W 0 аҫҫӗ .
SFX W р маҫҫӗ .
SFX W 0 аятӑп .
SFX W 0 аймастӑп .
SFX W 0 аятӑн .
SFX W 0 аймастӑн .
SFX W 0 аять .
SFX W 0 аймасть .
SFX W 0 аятпӑр .
SFX W 0 аймастпӑр .
SFX W 0 аятӑр .
SFX W 0 аймастӑр .
SFX W 0 аяҫҫӗ .
SFX W 0 аймаҫҫӗ .
SFX W 0 ӑп .
SFX W р мӑп .
SFX W 0 ӑн .
SFX W р мӑн .
SFX W 0 ӗ .
SFX W р мӗ .
SFX W 0 ӑпӑр .
SFX W р мӑпӑр .
SFX W 0 ӑр .
SFX W р мӑр .
SFX W 0 ӗҫ .
SFX W р мӗҫ .
SFX W р тӑм .
SFX W р марӑм .
SFX W р тӑн .
SFX W р марӑн .
SFX W р чӗ .
SFX W р марӗ .
SFX W р тӑмӑр .
SFX W р марӑмӑр .
SFX W р тӑр .
SFX W р марӑр .
SFX W р чӗҫ .
SFX W р марӗҫ .
SFX W 0 аттӑм .
SFX W 0 аттӑмччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑмччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑм .
SFX W 0 аттӑн .
SFX W 0 аттӑнччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑнччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑн .
SFX W 0 атчӗ .
SFX W р мастчӗ .
SFX W 0 аттӑмӑр .
SFX W 0 аттӑмӑрччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑмӑрччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑмӑр .
SFX W 0 аттӑр .
SFX W 0 аттӑрччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑрччӗ .
SFX W р мастӑр .
SFX W 0 атчӗҫ .
SFX W р мастчӗҫ .
SFX W 0 саттӑм .
SFX W 0 саттӑмччӗ .
SFX W 0 саттӑн .
SFX W 0 саттӑнччӗ .
SFX W 0 саччӗ .
SFX W 0 саттӑмӑр .
SFX W 0 саттӑмӑрччӗ .
SFX W 0 саттӑр .
SFX W 0 саттӑрччӗ .
SFX W 0 саччӗҫ .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑм .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑмччӗ .
SFX W р мӑттӑм .
SFX W р мӑттӑмччӗ .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑн .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑнччӗ .
SFX W р мӑттӑн .
SFX W р мӑттӑнччӗ .
SFX W 0 ӗччӗ .
SFX W р мӗччӗ .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑмӑр .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑмӑрччӗ .
SFX W р мӑттӑмӑр .
SFX W р мӑттӑмӑрччӗ .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑр .
SFX W 0 ӑттӑрччӗ .
SFX W р мӑттӑр .
SFX W р мӑттӑрччӗ .
SFX W 0 ӗччӗҫ .
SFX W р мӗччӗҫ .
SFX W 0 ӑпин .
SFX W р мӑпин .
SFX W 0 ӑсӑн .
SFX W р мӑсӑн .
SFX W 0 ин .
SFX W р мин .
SFX W 0 ӑпӑрин .
SFX W р мӑпӑрин .
SFX W 0 ӑсӑр .
SFX W р мӑсӑр .
SFX W 0 ӗҫин .
SFX W р мӗҫин .
SFX W 0 ам .
SFX W р тӑр .
SFX W 0 ар .
SFX W 0 ӑр .
SFX W р ччӑр .
SFX W р ма .
SFX W р масӑр .
SFX W р машкӑн .
SFX W 0 акан/A .
SFX W р ни/A .
SFX W р манни/A .
SFX W 0 ас .
SFX W 0 асшӑн .
SFX W р нӑ .
SFX W р малла .
SFX W 0 ан .
SFX W 0 са .
SFX W 0 сан .
SFX W р масан .
SFX W 0 сассӑн .
SFX W р масассӑн .
SFX W 0 а .
SFX W 0 иччен .
SFX W р миччен .
SFX W р массерен .
SFX W р нӑҫемӗн .
